src/fst/stems/articles.lexc
!!TODO Change this lexc file to be called particles??
LEXICON Articles
ang+Nom:ang # ;
sang+Obl:sang # ;
sing+Obl+Abst:sing # ;
sa+Loc:sa # ;
nga+Lig:nga # ;
mga+Pl:mga # ;
si+Nom+Pers:si # ;
ni+Obl+Pers:ni # ;
kay+Loc+Pers:kay # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions
kag+CC:kag # "and" ;
kon+Cond:kon # "if" ;
pero+CC:pero # "but" ;
apang+CC:apang # "but" ;
gani+CC:gani # "therefore" ;
tungod+CC:tungod # "because" ;
ukon+CC:ukon # "or" ;
kundi+CC:kundi # "rather" ;
agud+CC:agud # "in order to" ;

LEXICON Particles
wala+Neg:wala # "none" ;
indi+Neg:indi # "no" ;
bala+Qst:bala # ;
ba+Qst:ba # ;
